Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 11. STATE SYMBOLS AND HONORS; PRESERVATION

SUBTITLE A. STATE SYMBOLS AND HONORS

CHAPTER 3101. STATE SYMBOLS

Sec. 3101.001. STATE SEAL. (a) The state seal is as provided by Section 19, Article IV, Texas Constitution.

(b) The reverse side of the state seal contains a shield displaying a depiction of:

(1) the Alamo;

(2) the cannon of the Battle of Gonzales; and

(3) Vince's Bridge.

(c) The shield on the reverse side of the state seal is encircled by:

(1) live oak and olive branches; and

(2) the unfurled flags of:

(A) the Kingdom of France;

(B) the Kingdom of Spain;

(C) the United Mexican States;

(D) the Republic of Texas;

(E) the Confederate States of America; and

(F) the United States of America.

(d) Above the shield is emblazoned the motto, "REMEMBER THE ALAMO," and beneath the shield are the words, "TEXAS ONE AND INDIVISIBLE."

(e) A white five-pointed star hangs over the shield, centered between the flags.

(f) The secretary of state by rule shall adopt the standard design for the state seal, including the reverse side of the seal.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 3101.002. STATE ARMS. (a) The state arms are a five-pointed white star, on an azure background, encircled by olive and live oak branches.

(b) The secretary of state by rule shall adopt the standard design for the state arms.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 3101.003. USE OF STATE SEAL. A law that requires the use of the state seal does not require the use of the reverse of the state seal or the state arms.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 3101.004. STATE MOTTO. The state motto is "Friendship."

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 3101.005. STATE SONG. The state song, "Texas, Our Texas" by William J. Marsh and Gladys Yoakum Wright, is as follows:

Texas, our Texas! All hail the mighty State!

Texas, our Texas! So wonderful so great!

Boldest and grandest, Withstanding ev'ry test;

O Empire wide and glorious, You stand supremely blest.

Refrain:

God bless you Texas! And keep you brave and strong,

That you may grow in power and worth,

Thro'out the ages long.

Texas, O Texas! Your freeborn single star,

Sends out its radiance to nations near and far.

Emblem of freedom! It sets our hearts aglow,

With thoughts of San Jacinto and glorious Alamo.

Refrain

Texas, dear Texas! From tyrant grip now free,

Shines forth in splendor your star of destiny!

Mother of heroes! We come your children true,

Proclaiming our allegiance, our faith, our love for you.

Refrain

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 3101.006. PERFORMANCE OF STATE SONG. (a) During the performance of the state song:

(1) when the state flag is displayed:

(A) each citizen of this state who is present and not in uniform should:

(i) face the flag and stand at attention with the person's right hand over the heart; and

(ii) if wearing a head covering that is easy to remove, remove the head covering with the right hand and hold it at the person's left shoulder, with the person's right hand over the heart;

(B) each person who is present and in uniform should make the military salute at the first note of the state song and retain that position until the last note;

(C) each person who is present, not in uniform, and a member of the armed forces or a veteran may make the military salute at the first note of the state song and retain that position until the last note; and

(D) each person who is present but not a citizen of this state should stand at attention; and

(2) when the state flag is not displayed, each person present should face toward the music and act in the same manner as the person would if the state flag were displayed there.

(b) The state song should be performed after the national anthem if both are performed.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 962 (S.B. 1968), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 3101.007. STATE BIRD. The state bird is the mockingbird.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 3101.008. STATE FLOWER. The state flower is the bluebonnet.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 3101.009. STATE TREE. The state tree is the pecan tree.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 3101.010. THRASHING PECANS; PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person causes pecans to fall from a pecan tree by any means, including by thrashing, unless the tree is located on:

(1) land owned by the person causing the pecans to fall;

(2) privately owned land, and the person causing the pecans to fall has the written consent of the owner, lessee, or authorized agent of the owner or lessee;

(3) land owned by the state or a political subdivision of the state and in the boundaries of a municipality, and the person causing the pecans to fall has written consent from an officer or agent of the agency or political subdivision controlling the land or from the mayor of the municipality; or

(4) land owned by the state or a political subdivision of the state and outside the boundaries of a municipality, and the person causing the pecans to fall has written consent from an officer or agent of the agency or political subdivision controlling the property or from the county judge of the county.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor and on conviction is punishable by:

(1) a fine of not less than $5 or more than $300;

(2) confinement in the county jail for a term not to exceed three months; or

(3) both a fine and confinement.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 3101.011. STATE PLAYS. The following plays are official state plays of Texas:

(1) The Lone Star presented in Galveston Island State Park;

(2) Texas presented in the Palo Duro Canyon State Park;

(3) Beyond the Sundown presented at the Alabama-Coushatta Indian Reservation; and

(4) Fandangle presented in Shackelford County.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 7.001, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 3101.012. TEJANO MUSIC HALL OF FAME. The Tejano Music Hall of Fame Museum in Alice is the official Texas Tejano Music Hall of Fame.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 9.022(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 3101.013. STATE BOTANICAL GARDEN AND ARBORETUM. The state botanical garden and arboretum is the Lady Bird Johnson Wildflower Center at The University of Texas at Austin.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 79 (H.B. 394), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.